Mississippi, session 2026, SB2895.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 1, Chapter 489, Laws of 2025, is brought forward as follows: Section 1.  (1)  Each of the agencies that administer grant funds under the programs listed in subsection (2) of this section shall report to the Department of Finance and Administration by October 1, 2025, the amount of funds that have been expensed, the amounts remaining to be expended and/or the amounts remaining to be requested for reimbursement by each subgrantee.  Each of the agencies shall notify all the subgrantees of this reporting requirement, in a form provided by the Department of Finance and Administration, within thirty (30) days of the effective date of this act and shall provide a second notice on September 1, 2025.  On November 3, 2025, the Department of Finance and Administration shall submit the combined reporting of all funds to the Lieutenant Governor, Speaker of the House, House and Senate Appropriations Chairmen, and the Legislative Budget Office. (2)  The programs to which the reporting requirements of subsection (1) of this section apply are: (a)  The Skilled Nursing Home and Hospital Nurses Retention Loan Repayment Program established under Section 37-106-64; (b)  The Accelerate Mississippi Workforce Development Program established under Section 37-153-57; (c)  The Mississippi Health Sciences Training Infrastructure Grant Program established under Section 37-153-59; (d)  The Accelerate Mississippi Nursing/Allied Health Grant Program, established under Section 37-153-205; (e)  The Accelerate Mississippi Physician Residency and Fellowship Start-Up Grant Program established under Section 37-153-207; (f)  The Mississippi Allied Health College and Career Navigator Grant Program established under Section 37-153-209; (g)  The Independent Schools Infrastructure Grant Program established under Section 37-185-21; (h)  The Mississippi Association of Independent Colleges and Universities Infrastructure Grant Program established under Section 37-185-31; (i)  The ARPA Rural Water Associations Infrastructure Grant Program established under Section 41-3-16.1; (j)  The Mississippi Hospital Sustainability Grant Program Section established under 41-9-371; (k)  The COVID-19 Mississippi Local Provider Innovation Grant Program established under Section 41-139-1; (l)  The COVID-19 Hospital Expanded Capacity Program established under Section 41-14-31; (m)  The Mississippi Municipality and County Water Infrastructure Grant Program established under Section 49-2-131; (n)  The programs to support tourism activities, destination marketing organizations, nonprofit museums and the Mississippi Main Street Association established under Sections 57-123-1 through 57-123-11 and Sections 57-123-51 through 57-123-55; and (o)  The ARPA-MDOT Maintenance Project Fund established under Section 65-1-141.3. SECTION 2. Section 2, Chapter 489, Laws of 2025 is amended as follows: Section 2.  Each agency to which funds were appropriated or reappropriated by the Legislature from the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund or the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Lost Revenue Fund in any fiscal year shall report the amount and source of those funds that have not been expended by November 1, 2025.  The entities subject to this reporting requirement shall include, but not be limited to, the following:  the Mississippi Office of Workforce Development, the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency, the Department of Environmental Quality, the Department of Finance and Administration, the State Department of Health, the Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services, the University of Mississippi Medical Center, the Mississippi Postsecondary Education Financial Assistance Board, the Department of Mental Health, the Mississippi National Guard, the Department of Public Safety, the District Attorney's and staff, the Office of State Public Defender, the Supreme Court  Administrative Office of Courts, and the Mississippi Department of Transportation.  This report shall be filed by December 1, 2025, with the Department of Finance and Administration, the Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House, and the Secretary of the Senate, and the Clerk of the House shall distribute the report to the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House, and the Senate and House Appropriations Chairs. SECTION 3.  Section 4, Chapter 509, Laws of 2024, as amended by Section 3, Chapter 489, Laws of 2025, is amended as follows: Section 4.  (1)  (a) The Legislature, based upon current United States Treasury guidance, has determined that all Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds must be obligated by December 31, 2024, and expended by December 31, 2026. (b)  For the purposes of this section and Chapter 489, Laws of 2025, the term "expended" means that all invoices for eligible services or commodities have been paid with warrants issued by the State of Mississippi. (2)  (a)  In order to meet the obligation deadline set forth by the United States Treasury, the State Fiscal Officer shall determine the amount of Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds appropriated to various agencies that will not be obligated as of October 1, 2024. (b)  In making the determination required by this section, the State Fiscal Officer shall use the guidance released by the United States Treasury to determine if the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds are not obligated. (3)  If at any time during the period from passage of this act to October 1, 2024, a state agency determines that Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds will not be obligated by October 1, 2024, the state agency shall notify the State Fiscal Officer. (4)  If at any time the State Fiscal Officer determines that funds will be unobligated as of October 1, 2024, under subsection (2) or (3) of this section, the State Treasurer, in coordination with the State Fiscal Officer, shall transfer these funds to the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund (Fund No. 682111300) by no later than October 5, 2024.  The State Fiscal Officer may retain an amount not to exceed the lesser of the estimated cost of ARPA administration or Twenty-five Million Dollars ($25,000,000.00) in the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund to be utilized for administrative and reporting costs.  No later than October 6, 2024, the State Treasurer, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer, shall transfer the funds to the ARPA-MDOT Maintenance Project Fund. (5)  If at any time the State Fiscal Officer determines that funds are available after October 5, 2024, until September 30, 2026, the State Fiscal Officer, in conjunction with the State Treasurer, shall transfer the available funds to the ARPA-MDOT Maintenance Project Fund.  On or after September 30, 2026, any funds that are determined to be available shall be subject to subsection (8) of this section. (6)  (a)  If the programs listed in Section 1(2) or the entities listed in Section 2 of * * * this act Chapter 489, Laws of 2025, have a reporting requirement and a subgrantee has not provided two (2) consecutive monthly reports to the appropriate agency or entity under Section 1 or 2 of * * * this act Chapter 489, Laws of 2025, as required by that agency or entity, the funds associated with that subgrantee shall be considered available and the appropriate agency or entity under Section 1 or 2 of Chapter 489, Laws of 2025 shall notify the Department of Finance and Administration.  The State Treasurer, in conjunction with the Department of Finance and Administration, is authorized to transfer available funds associated with that subgrantee to the ARPA-MDOT Maintenance Project Fund.  On or after September 30, 2026, any funds held by a subgrantee, agency, or entity that are not meeting the reporting requirements in this subsection, or as otherwise provided by law, shall be deemed available and shall be subject to subsection (8) of this section. (b)  If a subgrantee fails to submit a monthly report to the appropriate agency or entity under Section 1 or 2 of Chapter 489, Laws of 2025, the agency or entity shall notify the subgrantee of such delinquency.  The notice shall state that if the delinquent report is not submitted on or before the due date of the next required monthly report, the subgrantee will have failed to provide two (2) consecutive monthly reports, and the funds associated with that subgrantee will be considered available and will be transferred in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection. (7)  (a)  If the programs listed in Section 1(2) or the entities listed in Section 2 of Chapter 489, Laws of 2025, have a reporting requirement and a subgrantee has not made a reimbursement request in two (2) consecutive monthly reporting periods to the appropriate agency or entity under Section 1 or 2 of Chapter 489, Laws of 2025, as required by that agency or entity, then the fund associated with that subgrantee shall be considered available and the appropriate agency or entity under Section 1 or 2 of Chapter 489, Laws of 2025, must notify the Department of Finance and Administration.  The State Treasurer, in conjunction with the Department of Finance and Administration, is authorized to transfer available or unexpended funds associated with that subgrantee to the ARPA-MDOT Maintenance Project Fund.  On or after September 30, 2026, any funds held by a subgrantee, agency, or entity that are not meeting the reimbursement requirements in this subsection, or as otherwise provided by law, shall be deemed available and shall be subject to subsection (8) of this section. (b)  If a subgrantee fails to submit a reimbursement request in two (2) consecutive monthly reporting periods to the appropriate agency or entity under Section 1 or 2 of Chapter 489, Laws of 2025, the agency or entity shall notify the subgrantee of such delinquency.  The notice shall state that if a reimbursement request is not submitted on or before the due date of the next required monthly report, the subgrantee will have failed to make a reimbursement request in two (2) consecutive months, and the funds associated with that subgrantee will be considered available and will be transferred in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection. (8)  On or after September 30, 2026, the State Fiscal Officer shall determine the amount of funds that are available or unexpended under the programs in Section 1 of Chapter 489, Laws of 2025, or appropriated or reappropriated to the entities in Section 2 of Chapter 489, Laws of 2025, by the Legislature from the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund or the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Lost Revenue Fund.  The State Treasurer, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer, shall transfer these funds to the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund (Fund No. 682111300) by no later than October 15, 2026.  The only Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds that may be excluded from this transfer are those held by the State Fiscal Officer for administrative and reporting costs related to the administration and implementation of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021. (9)  Upon the completion of the transfers in subsection (8) of this section, the State Treasurer, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer, shall transfer up to One Hundred Sixty-two Million Nine Hundred Fifty-eight Thousand Twelve Dollars ($162,958,012.00) from the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund (Fund No. 682111300) to the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Lost Revenue Fund (Fund No. 3822113000) by no later than October 15, 2026. (10)  Upon the completion of the transfer in subsection (9) of this act, the State Treasurer, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer, shall transfer up to One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00) from the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Lost Revenue Fund (Fund No. 3822113000) to the ARPA-MDOT Project Lost Revenue Fund, created in Section 4 of this act, by no later than October 15, 2026. (11)  Upon the completion of the transfer in subsection (10) of this section, the State Treasurer, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer, shall transfer up to Sixty-two Million Nine Hundred Fifty-eight Thousand Twelve Dollars ($62,958,012.00) from the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Lost Revenue Fund (Fund No. 3822113000) to the ARPA-DFA-Office of Insurance Lost Revenue Fund, created in Section 5 of this act, by no later than October 15, 2026. (12)  (a)  Upon the completion of the transfer in subsection (11) of this section, the State Fiscal Officer may classify and transfer the remaining balance, if any, of the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund to assign remaining funds to eligible uses at the direction of the Governor in order to fully expend all Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds by December 31, 2026.  The State Fiscal Officer shall notify the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House, and the Director of the Legislative Budget Office of any such classification, transfer, or any needs that may arise with the requirement to fully expend all Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds. (b)  The Department of Finance and Administration shall report on the amount of the transfers from subsections (8) through (12) of this section and the remaining amount of funds remaining in the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund to assign to eligible uses in order to fully expend all Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds by December 31, 2026.  This report shall be filed by October 30, 2026, with the Secretary of the Senate, the Clerk of the House, and the executive director of the Legislative Budget Office.  The Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House shall distribute the report to the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House and the Senate and House Appropriations Chairs. (13)  In carrying out its responsibilities under subsection (12) of this section, for any contract under the purview of the Public Procurement Review Board, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be exempt from any requirement that the Public Procurement Review Board approve any personal or professional services contracts or pre-approve any solicitation of such contracts.  This subsection shall stand repealed on July 1, 2027. SECTION 4.  The following shall be codified as Section 65-1-141.4, Mississippi Code of 1972: 65-1-141.4.  (1) There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "ARPA-MDOT Project Lost Revenue Fund," which shall consist of funds made available by the Legislature in any manner and funds from any other source designated for deposit into such fund.  The fund shall be maintained by the State Treasurer as a separate and special fund, separate and apart from the General Fund of the state.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund.  Monies in the fund shall be used by the Department of Transportation for eligible Surface Transportation projects included in the Three-Year Plan as adopted by, amended by, or reissued by the Mississippi Transportation Commission under the authority of Section 65-1-141. The Department of Transportation may escalate its budget upon receiving Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Lost Revenue Funds and expend such funds in accordance with rules and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration in a manner consistent with the escalation of federal funds. SECTION 5. There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "ARPA-DFA-Office of Insurance Lost Revenue Fund," which shall consist of funds made available by the Legislature in any manner and funds from any other source designated for deposit into such fund.  The fund shall be maintained by the State Treasurer as a separate and special fund, separate and apart from the General Fund of the state.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund.  Monies in the fund shall be used by the Department of Finance and Administration for eligible expenses of the State and School Employees' Life and Health Insurance Plan.  The Department of Finance and Administration may escalate its budget upon receiving Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Lost Revenue Funds and expend such funds in accordance with rules and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration in a manner consistent with the escalation of federal funds. SECTION 6.  Section 37-106-64, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-106-64.  (1)  There is established the "Skilled Nursing Home and Hospital Nurses Retention Loan Repayment Program" for nursing graduates to be administered by the Mississippi Postsecondary Education Financial Assistance Board. (2)  Subject to the availability of funds, an eligible applicant for an initial award must have: (a)  Legal residency in the State of Mississippi; (b)  Gained employment as a full-time licensed practical nurse or licensed registered nurse at a skilled nursing home in the State of Mississippi or a general acute care hospital in the State of Mississippi that is licensed by the Mississippi State Department of Health; (c)  A current relevant Mississippi professional license; and (d)  Outstanding qualifying educational loans, received at any point during the recipients postsecondary education career, which may include the principal, interest and related expenses such as the required interest premium on the unpaid balances of government and commercial loans obtained by the recipient for educational expense. (3)  Persons who have received funds from state-forgivable loan programs established under Mississippi law, or who are in default or delinquent on any federal, state, local or commercial qualifying educational loan, shall not be eligible for this program. (4)  Recipients in the program shall be selected on a first-come, first-served basis from all eligible applicants.  The Mississippi Postsecondary Education Financial Assistance Board shall renew eligible applicants approved in prior years only if the renewal applicant continues to meet the standards set forth in this section, and the renewal applicant has not received full funding provided by this subsection (4). (5)  Awards for recipients who are employed at a skilled nursing home or a licensed general acute care hospital in the state may be a maximum of Six Thousand Dollars ($6,000.00) for each year of employment up to three (3) years. (6)  A recipient shall not be penalized for ending employment at a skilled nursing home or a licensed general acute care hospital in the State of Mississippi if the recipient begins working for another skilled nursing home or licensed general acute care hospital in the State of Mississippi during the year on which the award is based. (7)  Awards shall be granted on a year-to-year basis, and recipients have no obligation to seek a subsequent award. (8)  Awards shall be paid annually, after the expiration of the year of employment for which the award was granted, to the recipient's lender or loan service provider, to be applied to the outstanding balance.  Monies paid by the recipient or on the recipient's behalf toward qualifying educational loans before payment of the award shall not be eligible for reimbursement through the program. (9)  During the employment year for which the award is granted, a recipient shall at all times keep the State Financial Aid Board informed of any changes to the recipient's current, correct and complete employment information and status. (10)  Recipients, who fail to maintain a relevant Mississippi professional license or fail to fulfill the year of employment on which the award was based, forfeit any right to the award. (11)  The Mississippi Postsecondary Education Financial Assistance Board, in collaboration with the State Board of Nursing and any other applicable state agency as determined by the Mississippi Postsecondary Education Financial Assistance Board, shall attempt to track award recipients under this program through their third employment year, unless the recipient leaves employment at a skilled nursing home or a licensed general acute care hospital in the state at an earlier date.  Data collected shall include each recipients' place of employment and any other pertinent information necessary to determine the efficacy of the program in retaining nurses in skilled nursing homes or licensed general acute care hospitals in the State of Mississippi. (12)  The Mississippi Postsecondary Education Financial Assistance Board shall promulgate regulations necessary for the proper administration of this section, including setting a fiscal year policy for the program and application dates and deadlines. (13)  Grant funds shall be available under this section through September 30, 2026. ( * * *1314)  This section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2027. SECTION 7.  Section 37-153-63, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-153-63.  Grant funds shall be available under this article through * * * December 31 September 30, 2026 * * *, or on the date of the fund expenditure deadline provided by the federal government, whichever occurs later.  Each grant recipient shall certify, for any project for which a grant is awarded, that if the project is not completed by * * * December 31 September 30, 2026, and the United States Congress does not enact an extension of the deadline on the availability of ARPA funds, then the grant recipient will complete the project through other funds. SECTION 8.  Section 37-153-217, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-153-217.  Grant funds shall be available under this article through * * * December 31 September 30, 2026 * * *, or on the date of the fund expenditure deadline provided by the federal government, whichever occurs later.  Each grant recipient shall certify, for any project for which a grant is awarded, that if the project is not completed by * * * December 31 September 30, 2026, and the United States Congress does not enact an extension of the deadline on the availability of ARPA funds, then the grant recipient will complete the project through other funds. SECTION 9.  Section 37-185-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-185-21.  (1)  This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Independent Schools Infrastructure Grant Program Act of 2022." (2)  There is established the Independent Schools Infrastructure Grant Program, to be administered by the Department of Finance and Administration.  Under the program, eligible independent schools may apply for reimbursable grants to make necessary investments in water, wastewater, stormwater, broadband and other eligible infrastructure projects to be funded by the Legislature using Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds made available under the federal American Rescue Plan Act (ARPA).  The program shall be funded from appropriations by the Legislature to the department from the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund. (3)  The use of grants shall be subject to audit by the United States Department of the Treasury's Office of Inspector General and the Mississippi Office of the State Auditor.  An eligible independent school found to be fully or partially noncompliant with grant requirements shall return to the state all or a portion of the grant monies received and used for unallowable expenditures.  Applicants shall confirm their understanding of these terms. (4)  For purposes of this section, unless the context requires otherwise, the following terms shall have the meanings as defined in this subsection: (a) "Program" means the Independent Schools Infrastructure Grant Program established under this section. (b)  "ARPA" means the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, which amends Title VI of the Social Security Act. (c)  "ARPA funds" means Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds awarded through Section 602 of Title VI of the Social Security Act amended by Section 9901 of the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, Public Law 117-2. (d) "Department" means the Department of Finance and Administration. (e)  "Eligible independent school" means any private or nonpublic school operating within the State of Mississippi that: (i)  Is a member of the Midsouth Association of Independent Schools (MAIS) and located in the State of Mississippi; or (ii)  Is accredited by a state, regional or national accrediting organization; and (iii)  Is not subject to the purview of authority of the State Board of Education. (5)  On or before July 1, 2022, the department shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to administer the program established under this section, including application procedures and deadlines. (6)  Funds under the program shall be awarded for ARPA eligible projects in the following order: (a)  Eligible water, wastewater and stormwater projects under the Environmental Protection Agency's Clean Water State Revolving Fund (CWSRF) or Drinking Water State Revolving Fund (DWSRF) and other eligible water projects allowable by ARPA; (b)  Broadband infrastructure projects; (c)  Capital investments for prevention, mitigation and ventilation in congregate living facilities and other key settings; and (d)  Any eligible project through ARPA guidelines, guidance, rules, regulations and/or other criteria, as may be amended from time to time, of the United States Department of the Treasury, excluding premium pay for employees. (7)  The governing board of any eligible independent school may submit an application for grant funds under this section.  Applicants shall certify to the department that each expenditure of the funds awarded to them by the department under this section is in compliance with the ARPA guidelines, guidance, rules, regulations and/or other criteria, as may be amended from time to time, by the United States Department of the Treasury regarding the use of monies from the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund.  Subsequent submissions will be due by the dates established by the department. (8)  An application for a grant under this section shall be submitted at such time, be in such form, and contain such information as the department prescribes.  Each application shall include the following at a minimum:  applicant contact information; project description and type of project; project map; estimate of the population served by the project; estimated project cost; estimated project schedule; and readiness to proceed.  The department is authorized to accept additional rounds of grant proposals for application consideration as needed. (9)  Applications shall be reviewed, and the department shall certify that each project submitted is eligible under ARPA and all applicable guidance issued by the United States Department of the Treasury.  For water, wastewater and stormwater projects, the department must also certify that it is a "necessary investment" in water, wastewater or stormwater infrastructure as defined in ARPA and all applicable guidance issued by the United States Department of the Treasury. Grant agreements shall be executed between the recipient and the department. All final awards shall be determined at the discretion of the executive director of the department.  Funds shall be made available to a grantee upon the execution of a grant agreement between the department and the approved applicant, and the department obtains the necessary support for reimbursement. (10)  Grant funds shall be used prospectively, and grants are not available to cover the costs of debt incurred before July 1, 2022. (11)  The maximum amount of grant funds that may be awarded to any eligible independent school under the program is One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00). (12)  The department shall submit to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee by October 1 of each year an annual report about the program.  The reports shall contain the applications received, the amount of grant funds awarded to each applicant, the amount of grant funds expended by each applicant, and the status of each applicant's project. (13)  Grant funds received under this section must be obligated no later than December 31, 2024, and must be expended no later than * * * December 31 September 30, 2026.  Each grant recipient shall certify for any project for which a grant is awarded that if the project is not completed by * * * December 31 September 30, 2026, and the United States Congress does not enact an extension of the deadline on the availability of ARPA funds, then the grant recipient will complete the project using any other funds available. (14)  The department may retain an amount not to exceed Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00) of the total funds allocated to the program to defray its administrative costs. (15)  This section shall stand repealed on July 1, * * * 2026 2027. SECTION 10.  Section 37-185-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-185-31.  (1)  This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Association of Independent Colleges and Universities (MAICU) Infrastructure Grant Program Act of 2022." (2)  There is hereby established within the Mississippi Department of Finance and Administration, the Mississippi Association of Independent Colleges and Universities (MAICU) Infrastructure Grant Program under which independent colleges and universities may apply for reimbursable grants to make necessary investments in water, wastewater, stormwater, broadband and other eligible infrastructure projects to be funded by the Legislature utilizing Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds made available under the federal American Rescue Plan Act (ARPA).  Such grants shall be made available to the following institutions:  Belhaven University, Blue Mountain College, Millsaps College, Mississippi College, Rust College, Tougaloo College and William Carey University.  Grant program funds shall be distributed to each listed institution based on the pro rata share of full-time equivalent students enrolled in the respective college or university.  For purposes of this distribution, a full-time equivalent student shall be calculated as follows: (a)  One (1) full-time student shall be considered one (1) full-time equivalent student; (b)  One (1) part-time student shall be considered one-half (1/2) of a full-time equivalent student; and (c)  One (1) online student shall be considered one-fourth (1/4) of a full-time equivalent student. (3)  For purposes of this section, unless the context requires otherwise, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein: (a)  "MAICU Grant Program" shall mean the Mississippi Association of Independent Colleges and Universities (MAICU) Infrastructure Grant Program. (b)  "ARPA" shall mean the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, which amends Title VI of the Social Security Act. (c)  "State Recovery Funds" shall mean Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds awarded through Section 602 of Title VI of the Social Security Act amended by Section 9901 of the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, Public Law 117-2. (d) "Department" shall mean the Department of Finance and Administration. (4)  On or before July 1, 2022, the Mississippi Department of Finance and Administration shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to administer the MAICU Grant Program prescribed under this section, including application procedures and deadlines. (5)  Funds under the MAICU Grant Program shall be awarded for ARPA eligible projects in the following order: (a)  Eligible water, wastewater and stormwater projects under the Environmental Protection Agency's Clean Water State Revolving Fund (CWSRF) or Drinking Water State Revolving Fund (DWSRF) and other eligible water projects allowable by ARPA; (b)  Broadband infrastructure projects; (c)  Capital investments for prevention, mitigation and ventilation in congregate living facilities and other key settings; and (d)  Any eligible project through ARPA guidelines, guidance, rules, regulations and/or other criteria, as may be amended from time to time, of the United States Department of the Treasury, excluding premium pay. (6)  The boards of trustees of the respective members of the Mississippi Association of Independent Colleges and Universities (MAICU) may submit an application for grant funds under this section.  Applicants shall certify to the Department of Finance and Administration that each expenditure of the funds awarded to them by the department under this section is in compliance with the ARPA guidelines, guidance, rules, regulations and/or other criteria, as may be amended from time to time, by the United States Department of the Treasury regarding the use of monies from the State Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds.  Subsequent submissions will be due by the dates established by the department. (7)  An application for a grant under this section shall be submitted at such time, be in such form, and contain such information as the department prescribes.  Each application shall include the following at a minimum:  applicant contact information; project description and type of project; project map; estimate of the population served by the projects; estimated project cost; estimated project schedule; and readiness to proceed.  The Mississippi Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to accept additional rounds of grant proposals for application consideration as needed. (8)  Applications shall be reviewed, and the Mississippi Department of Finance and Administration shall certify that each project submitted is eligible under the American Rescue Plan Act and all applicable guidance issued by the United States Department of the Treasury.  For water, wastewater and stormwater projects, the department must also certify that it is a "necessary investment" in water, wastewater or stormwater infrastructure as defined in the American Rescue Plan Act and all applicable guidance issued by the United States Department of the Treasury. Grant agreements shall be executed between the recipient and the Mississippi Department of Finance and Administration.  All final awards will be determined at the discretion of the executive director of the department.  Funds shall be made available to a grantee upon the execution of a grant agreement between the department and the approved applicant, and the department obtains the necessary support for reimbursement. (9)  Grant requirements shall be used prospectively, and grants are not available to cover the costs of debt incurred prior to the enactment of this program. (10)  (a)  There is hereby created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the "Mississippi Association of Independent Colleges and Universities (MAICU) Grant Program Fund," which shall consist of funds appropriated by the Legislature from federal American Rescue Plan Act (ARPA) monies or other available federal grant funds for the purposes of awarding grants under this section.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not lapse into the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund or the State General Fund, and any interest earned on amounts in the fund shall remain in the fund.  The expenditure of monies in the Mississippi Association of Independent Colleges and Universities (MAICU) Grant Program Fund shall be under the direction of the Mississippi Department of Finance and Administration; (b)  All monies shall be disbursed from the fund created in this subsection shall be in compliance with the guidelines, guidance, rules, regulations or other criteria, as may be amended from time to time, of the United States Department of the Treasury regarding the use of monies received by or on behalf of the State of Mississippi through the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund established by the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (Public Law No. 117-2).  Unexpended amounts remaining in the funds at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund or the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the program fund shall be deposited to the credit of COVID-19 Hospital Expanded Capacity Program Fund; (c)  If there are unobligated Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund monies remaining in the fund created in this section, on the later of December 17, 2024, or fourteen (14) days prior to the fund obligation deadline provided by the federal government, the Department of Finance and Administration shall transfer these unobligated balances to the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund.  The Department of Finance and Administration shall then transfer the unobligated balance of Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds from the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund to the State and School Employees' Life and Health Insurance Fund for an amount not to exceed the lesser of Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) or the amount of allowable ARPA expenditures, by no later than December 31, 2024, or on the date of the fund obligation deadline provided by the federal government.  The Department of Finance and Administration shall then transfer all remaining unobligated balances of Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds from the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund to the Unemployment Compensation Fund up to the ARPA allowable amount, by no later than December 31, 2024, or on the date of the fund obligation deadline provided by the federal government; and (d)  The use of funds allocated under this program shall be subject to audit by the United States Department of the Treasury's Office of Inspector General and the Mississippi Office of the State Auditor.  Each person receiving funds under these programs found to be fully or partially noncompliant with the requirements in this section shall return to the state all or a portion of the funds received. (11)  The department shall submit to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee by October 1 of each year an annual report.  The reports shall contain the applications received, the amount of grant funds awarded to each applicant, the amount of grant funds expended by each applicant, and the status of each applicant's project. (12)  Grant funds shall be available under this section through * * * December 31 September 30, 2026.  Each grant recipient shall certify for any project that a grant is awarded that in the event the project is not completed by * * * December 31 September 30, 2026, and the United States Congress does not enact an extension of the deadline on the availability of ARPA Funds, then the grant recipient will complete the project through any other funds available. (13)  The Mississippi Department of Finance and Administration may retain an amount not to exceed Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00) of the total funds allocated to the program to defray administrative costs. (14)  This section shall stand repealed on July 1, * * * 2026 2027. SECTION 11.  Section 41-3-16.1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-3-16.1.  (1)  (a)  The State Department of Health (department) shall establish a grant program to be known as the ARPA Rural Water Associations Infrastructure Grant Program (program) to assist rural water associations and entities in the construction of eligible drinking water infrastructure projects as provided in the Final Rule for the Coronavirus State and Local Fiscal Recovery Funds as established by the federal American Rescue Plan Act (ARPA). (b)  Rural water associations and any entity that received funding under the ARPA Rural Water Associations Infrastructure Grant Program or the Mississippi Municipality and County Water Infrastructure (MCWI) Grant Program before April 14, 2023, shall be ineligible for additional grants under this section. (2)  The program shall be funded from appropriations by the Legislature to the department from the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund, and the department shall expend all such funds for the purposes provided in subsection (1) of this section. (3)  The department shall obligate the funds by the deadline set by the rules and guidelines of the United States Department of the Treasury and will adhere to the Treasury's rules and guidelines for reporting and monitoring projects funded through ARPA. (4)  (a)  The department shall develop a system for use in ranking the grant applications received.  The ranking system shall include the following factors, at a minimum:  (a) the environmental impact of the proposed project; (b) the proposed project's ability to address noncompliance with state/federal requirements; (c) the extent to which the project promotes economic development; (d) the number of people served by the project (both new and existing users); (e) impacts of the proposed project on disadvantaged/overburdened communities; (f) the grant applicant's prior efforts to secure funding to address the proposed project's objectives; (g) the grant applicant's proposed contribution of other funds or in-kind cost-sharing to the proposed project; (h) the grant applicant's long-term plans for the financial and physical operation and maintenance of the project; and (i) the grant applicant's capacity to initiate construction in a timely manner and complete the proposed project by the deadline specified by rules and guidelines of the United States Department of the Treasury for ARPA funds. (b)  For the second round of grant awards, the department shall apply a greater weight to grant applications that promote consolidation of separate systems.  In order to receive the additional weight, the systems that will consolidate shall be in a proximity of each other as determined by the department. (c)  In addition to the points awarded under paragraph (b) of this subsection, an additional ten (10) points shall be added to any application with at least one (1) system that has consolidated after January 1, 2018, and before application to this program and is otherwise eligible under this section. (5)  An application for a grant under this section shall be submitted at such time, be in such form, and contain such information as the department prescribes. (6)  (a)  Upon the approval of an application for a grant under this section, the department shall enter into a project grant agreement with each grantee to establish the terms of the grant for the project, including the amount of the grant. (b)  (i)  For the first award of grants, the maximum amount of funds that may be provided to any rural water association or entity from all grants under the program is Two Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00). (ii)  For the second round of grant awards, the maximum amount of funds that may be provided to any eligible association or entity from all grants under the program is Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00). (c)  Associations or entities that received funding under the first round of grant awards for this program or received funding in the Mississippi Municipality and County Water Infrastructure Grant Program Act of 2022 are ineligible to receive funding under the second round. (7)  With any funds appropriated to the department for the program after April 1, 2024, the department shall distribute the funds to projects from the second round of grant awards in the order in which the applications were ranked for grants as long as the department determines that the project can obligate the funds by October 1, 2024, and expend the funds by * * * December 31 September 30, 2026.  Where the department determines that a project cannot obligate or expend the funds by the required dates, the department shall not fund the project, and it shall continue from the second round of grant awards in the order in which the applications were ranked for grants. (8)  The department shall have all powers necessary to implement and administer the program.  Of the funds appropriated to the department for the program, not more than five percent (5%) may be used by the department to cover the department's costs of administering the program. (9)  In carrying out its responsibilities under the program, for any contract under the purview of the Public Procurement Review Board (PPRB), the department shall be exempt from any requirement that the PPRB approve any personal or professional services contracts or pre-approve any solicitation of such contracts.  This subsection shall stand repealed on July 1, * * * 2026 2027. (10)  The department shall submit an annual report regarding the program no later than December 31 of each year to the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House, and the Chairmen of the Senate and House Appropriations Committees. (11)  For the purposes of this section, "entity" means: (a)  Any entity operating as a rural water association, regardless of whether such entities were user created, were initially organized not for profit, or have been granted tax-exempt status under state or federal law. (b)  Any nonprofit water or sewer provider not owned by the municipality or county and are not a Rural Water Association. (c)  Any entity eligible under this program shall be currently operating as a not-for-profit entity. (d)  "Entity" under this subsection does not include any state agency.  No state agency shall be eligible under this program. SECTION 12.  Section 41-9-371, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-9-371.  (1)  There is established the Mississippi Hospital Sustainability Grant Program which shall be administered by the State Department of Health. (2)  In order to strengthen, improve and preserve access to Mississippi hospital care services for all Mississippians and in recognition of the challenges incurred by Mississippi hospitals as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic, funds from the program shall be distributed, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to each hospital licensed by the State of Mississippi, except for hospitals operated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs and hospitals operated by the State Department of Mental Health.  Licensed specialty hospitals that are recognized as such by the State Department of Health, except for those excluded under this subsection, are eligible for grants under the program. (3)  The department shall distribute grants to each eligible hospital based upon the following formula: (a)  Each hospital that has fewer than one hundred (100) licensed beds and that is not classified as a critical access hospital that operates an emergency department shall be eligible to receive Six Hundred Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($625,000.00) to defray the costs of providing emergency department services. (b)  Each rural hospital that has fewer than one hundred (100) licensed beds and that is classified as a critical access hospital that operates an emergency department shall be eligible to receive Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) to defray the costs of providing emergency department services. (c)  Each hospital that operates an emergency department and that has more than one hundred (100) licensed beds shall be eligible to receive One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00). (d)  Each hospital with fewer than two hundred (200) licensed beds with the majority of such beds being dedicated to providing specialty services such as women's health services, long-term acute care, rehabilitation or psychiatric services shall be eligible to receive Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00). (e)  Each rural hospital with fewer than one hundred (100) licensed beds with no emergency department shall be eligible to receive Three Hundred Thousand Dollars ($300,000.00) to defray the costs of providing access to hospital care in rural communities. (f)  In addition to the funds provided in paragraphs (a) through (e) of this subsection, each small rural hospital with fifty (50) beds or less which operated an emergency department shall be eligible to receive Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) to defray the costs of providing access to hospital care in rural communities. (g)  In addition to the funds distributed in paragraphs (a) through (c) and (e) through (f) of this subsection, any remaining funds appropriated for the purposes of this grant program shall be distributed to hospitals receiving funds in paragraphs (a) through (c) and (e) through (f) of this subsection on a pro rata amount by dividing the total amount of the remaining funds by the number of licensed beds attributable to all licensed Mississippi hospitals except for licensed beds attributable to hospitals described in paragraph (d) of this subsection and for licensed beds attributable to hospitals operated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs and hospitals operated by the State Department of Mental Health and determining a dollar amount for each bed, and then multiplying that dollar amount by the number of licensed beds of that hospital. (4)  The department shall adopt such reasonable rules as necessary for the administration of the program, but shall not place additional qualification requirements on hospitals other than the minimum requirements in this section. (5)  The Mississippi Hospital Association shall form a work group to review the delivery of hospital services in Mississippi and shall make recommendations regarding the changes needed to sustain access to hospital care to the Lieutenant Governor, Speaker of the House, Chairmen of the House and Senate Public Health Committees with copies to the Governor and the State Health Officer. (6)  Grant funds shall be available under this section through September 30, 2026. SECTION 13.  Section 41-139-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-139-1.  (1)  As used in this section, the following terms shall be defined as provided in this subsection: (a)  "Local health care provider" or "provider" means a facility that is licensed, certified or otherwise authorized or permitted by law to provide health care in the ordinary course of business in the State of Mississippi, including, but not limited to, skilled nursing facilities, direct primary care clinics, provider owned clinics, rural health clinics, academic medical centers, community health centers and/or independent physician practices. (b)  "Transitional assistance" means any assistance related to changing a provider's current health care delivery model to a model more appropriate for the community that the provider serves, including, but not limited to: (i)  Conducting a market study of health care services needed and provided in the community; (ii)  Acquiring and implementing new technological tools and infrastructure, including, but not limited to, telemedicine delivery methods, development of health information exchange platforms to electronically share medical records, electronic health record optimization, purchasing connected devices, upgrading digital devices, improving broadband connectivity, public health reporting, and implementing online or mobile patient appointment management applications; and (iii)  Supporting the implementation of population health management. (2)  There is established the COVID-19 Mississippi Local Provider Innovation Grant Program to be administered by the State Department of Health.  The program and any grant awarded under the program shall be for the purpose of strengthening and improving the health care system and increasing access to health care services providers to help communities achieve and maintain optimal health by providing transitional assistance to providers. The department may award an innovation grant to a local health care provider that applies in accordance with this section. (3)  Eligible local health care providers shall provide the following information to the department in their application for a grant: (a)  A description of the location or locations for which the grant monies will be expended, including the name and locations of where the provider administers health care services; (b)  A statement of the amount of grant monies requested; (c)  A description of the needs of the provider, the transitional assistance for which the grant monies will be expended and how such transitional assistance will meet the stated needs; (d)  Evidence that the provider has played an active role in the community to combat the spread of COVID-19, including, but not limited to, testing, vaccination and antibody treatment; and (e)  Any other information that the department deems necessary to administer this section. (4)  Applicants are limited to one (1) application per business entity as determined by the applicant's business filing status with the Secretary of State.  Subsidiaries of the entity are not eligible to submit separate applications.  Health systems that affiliate, own or control multiple clinics are only eligible to submit one (1) application under the parent entity.  The department shall determine the amount of the grant to be awarded to each applicant based on the factors detailed in the application.  Applicants for grants that were approved and funded in the first round of grants awarded during fiscal year 2023 are eligible to apply for the second round of grants awarded during fiscal year 2024.  The maximum amount of any one (1) grant that may be awarded to an applicant is Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00).  Grants may be used for reimbursement of expenses of transitional assistance meeting federal and state requirements that were incurred by providers during the period beginning on March 3, 2021, through December 31, 2024. (5)  The department may expend up to one and one-half percent (1-1/2%) of the amount appropriated for the program for the expenses of administering the program, or the specific amount authorized for administrative expenses in the appropriation bill if that amount is higher. (6)  Grant funds shall be available under this section through September 30, 2026. SECTION 14.  Section 41-14-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-14-31.  (1)  The Mississippi Department of Health shall establish and administer the COVID-19 Hospital Expanded Capacity Program for the purpose of providing funds to hospitals that increased treatment capacity related to the COVID-19 pandemic. The program shall make grants to hospitals as a reimbursement for expenses incurred during the period beginning on March 3, 2021, through December 31, 2024, in the following manner: (a)  Funds shall first be expended for the reimbursement to hospitals for the creation of ICU beds at a maximum amount of Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00) per bed.  If the reimbursement for allowable expenditures submitted by all hospitals exceeds the amount of funds appropriated to this program, then the Department of Health shall allocate the reimbursement to each hospital per ICU bed created. (b)  After such reimbursement is made in paragraph (a) of this subsection, any remaining funds shall be used to reimburse hospitals for the creation of negative pressure beds at a maximum amount of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) per bed.  If the reimbursement for allowable expenditures submitted by all hospitals exceeds the amount of funds appropriated to this program, then the Department of Health shall allocate the reimbursement to each hospital per negative pressure bed created. (2)  The Department of Health shall: (a)  Promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the purposes of this act. (b)  Require all applications for grants to be filed no later than December 31, 2023. (c)  Require recipients of funds under this program to certify that the reimbursement for the creation of the intensive care units or negative pressure room is for allowable expenditures under the American Rescue Plan Act (ARPA) of 2021, Public Law 117-2, which amends Title VI of the Social Security Act; and its implementing guidelines, guidance, rules, regulations and/or other criteria, as may be amended or supplemented from time to time, by the United States Department of the Treasury. (d)  Certify to the Department of Finance and Administration that each expenditure of the funds appropriated to the office under this act is in compliance with the guidelines, guidance, rules, regulations and/or other criteria, as may be amended from time to time, of the United States Department of the Treasury regarding the use of monies from the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund in Section 9901 of ARPA. (3)  The department shall not: (a)  Reimburse hospitals for funds expended by the "Mississippi ICU Infrastructure Act," Sections 41-14-1 through 41-14-11. (b)  Reimburse hospitals for professional fees expended in the creation of the beds. (4)  The Department of Health may retain up to One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) of the funds appropriated to the program established in this act to pay reasonable expenses incurred in the administration of the program. (5)  The department shall operate and administer the grant program from funds appropriated by the Legislature from the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds. (6)  The Department of Health shall submit to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee before October 1 of each year an annual report containing, at a minimum, the number of submitted applications, the amount of grant funds awarded to each hospital for both ICU beds and negative pressure beds, and the number of ICU beds and negative pressure beds that were provided a reimbursement. (7)  Grant funds shall be available under this section through September 30, 2026. ( * * *78)  This act shall stand repealed on July 1, * * * 2026 2027. SECTION 15.  Section 49-2-131, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 49-2-131.  (1)  This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Municipality and County Water Infrastructure Grant Program Act of 2022." (2)  There is hereby established within the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality the Mississippi Municipality and County Water Infrastructure (MCWI) Grant Program under which municipalities, counties and certain public utilities not regulated by the Public Service Commission may apply until February 1, 2023, for reimbursable grants to make necessary investments in water, wastewater, and stormwater infrastructure to be funded by the Legislature utilizing Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds made available under the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (ARPA).  Such grants shall be made available to municipalities and counties to be matched with the Coronavirus Local Fiscal Recovery Funds awarded or to be awarded to them under ARPA on a one-to-one matching basis. Coronavirus Local Fiscal Recovery Funds that a county transfers to a municipality or that a county or municipality transfers to a public utility not regulated by the Public Service Commission are eligible on a one-to-one matching basis.  Municipalities that received less than One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) in the total allocation of Coronavirus Local Fiscal Recovery Funds are eligible for a two-to-one match only on the Coronavirus Local Fiscal Recovery Funds awarded or to be awarded to them under ARPA.  The Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality shall only accept two (2) rounds of submissions under the Mississippi Municipality and County Water Infrastructure (MCWI) Grant Program.  The second round of submissions shall be the final round.  The dollar amount for professional fees that can be allocated as a part of a county's, municipality's or public utility's matching share is not to exceed four percent (4%) of the total project cost. (3)  For purposes of this section, unless the context requires otherwise, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein: (a)  "MCWI Grant Program" means the Mississippi Municipality and County Water Infrastructure Grant Program. (b)  "ARPA" means the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, which amends Title VI of the Social Security Act. (c)  "State Recovery Funds" means Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds awarded through Section 602 of Title VI of the Social Security Act amended by Section 9901 of the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, Public Law 117-2. (d)  "Local Recovery Funds" means Coronavirus Local Fiscal Recovery Funds awarded through Section 603 of Title VI of the Social Security Act amended by Section 9901 of the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, Public Law 117-2. (e)  "Department" means the Department of Environmental Quality. (f)  "Professional fees" means fees for the services of attorneys and engineering, surveying, and environmental studies. (g) "Project" means the infrastructure improvements defined in an application that (i) complies with all requirements of ARPA, and (ii) is eligible for a grant award under this section. (4)  (a)  On or before July 1, 2022, the Department of Environmental Quality shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to administer the MCWI Grant Program prescribed under this section, including application procedures and deadlines.  The department is exempt from compliance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law in fulfilling the requirements of this section. (b)  The Department of Health shall advise the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality regarding all such rules and regulations as related to the federal Safe Drinking Water Act. (5)  Funding under the MCWI Grant Program shall be allocated to projects certified by the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality as eligible for federal funding, including, but not be limited to, the following: (a)  Construction of publicly owned treatment works; (b)  Projects pursuant to the implementation of a nonpoint source pollution management program established under the Clean Water Act (CWA); (c)  Decentralized wastewater treatment systems that treat municipal wastewater or domestic sewage; (d)  Management and treatment of stormwater or subsurface drainage water; (e)  Water conservation, efficiency, or reuse measures; (f)  Development and implementation of a conservation and management plan under the CWA; (g)  Watershed projects meeting the criteria set forth in the CWA; (h)  Energy consumption reduction for publicly owned treatment works; (i)  Reuse or recycling of wastewater, stormwater, or subsurface drainage water; (j)  Facilities to improve drinking water quality; (k)  Transmission and distribution, including improvements of water pressure or prevention of contamination in infrastructure and lead service line replacements; (l)  New sources to replace contaminated drinking water or increase drought resilience, including aquifer storage and recovery system for water storage; (m)  Storage of drinking water, such as to prevent contaminants or equalize water demands; (n)  Purchase of water systems and interconnection of systems; (o)  New community water systems; (p)  Culvert repair, resizing, and removal, replacement of storm sewers, and additional types of stormwater infrastructure; (q)  Dam and reservoir rehabilitation, if the primary purpose of dam or reservoir is for drinking water supply and project is necessary for the provision of drinking water; (r)  Broad set of lead remediation projects eligible under EPA grant programs authorized by the Water Infrastructure Improvements for the Nation (WIIN) Act; and (s)  Any eligible drinking water, wastewater or stormwater project through ARPA guidelines, guidance, rules, regulations and other criteria, as may be amended from time to time, by the United States Department of the Treasury. (6)  The governing authority of a municipality, county or public utility that is not regulated by the Public Service Commission may submit an application for grant funds under this section if the applicant is an operator-member of Mississippi 811, Inc., as defined in Section 77-13-3.  Applicants shall certify to the department that each expenditure of the funds awarded to them under this section is in compliance with ARPA guidelines, guidance, rules, regulations and other criteria, as may be amended from time to time, by the United States Department of the Treasury regarding the use of monies from the State Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds.  Subsequent submissions will be due by the dates established by the department. (7)  An application for a grant under this section shall be submitted at such time, be in such form, and contain such information as the department prescribes.  Each application for grant funds shall include the following at a minimum:  (a) applicant contact information; (b) project description and type of project; (c) project map; (d) estimate of population affected by the project; (e) disadvantaged community criteria (population, median household income, unemployment, current water/sewer rates); (f) estimated project cost; (g) list of match funds of direct Coronavirus Local Fiscal Recovery Funds received and to be received from the federal government, a certification that such funds have been or will be used for the project detailed in the application, and documentation of commitment; (h) estimated project schedule and readiness to proceed; (i) engineering services agreement; (j) engineering reports; and (k) information about status of obtaining any required permits. (8)  The department must apply a system for use in ranking the grant applications received, unless the Legislature funds all eligible grant requests under the program.  When applying the ranking system, the department shall apply a greater weight to projects that have approved engineering/design, plans and permits if the department has deemed the project is ready to begin construction within six (6) months. Projects that are included on the municipal or county engineer's approved list and provide applicable supporting documentation shall receive additional consideration awarded to the application.  The ranking system shall include the following factors, at a minimum:  (a) the environmental impact of the proposed project; (b) the proposed project's ability to address noncompliance with state/federal requirements; (c) the extent to which the project promotes economic development; (d) the number of people served by the project and the number of communities the project serves; (e) impacts of the proposed project on disadvantaged/overburdened communities; (f) the grant applicant's prior efforts to secure funding to address the proposed project's objectives; (g) the grant applicant's proposed contribution of other funds or in-kind cost-sharing to the proposed project; (h) the grant applicant's long-term plans for the financial and physical operation and maintenance of the project; (i) the grant applicant's capacity to initiate construction in a timely manner and complete the proposed project by the deadline specified by the United States Department of Treasury rules for ARPA funds; (j) the extent to which the project benefits multiple political subdivisions in a regional manner; (k) the project's ability to enhance public service infrastructure, including transportation and emergency access; and (l) any other factors as determined by the department. (9) The grant program shall include a specific emphasis on addressing the needs of an economically disadvantaged community, including providing safe, reliable drinking water in areas that lack infrastructure, providing sewage treatment capacity in unsewered areas and providing regional development of infrastructure to serve multiple communities. (10)  Applications shall be reviewed and scored as they are received, unless the Legislature funds all eligible grant requests under the program.  The Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality shall certify whether each project submitted is a "necessary investment" in water, wastewater, or stormwater infrastructure as defined in the American Rescue Plan Act and all applicable guidance issued by the United States Department of the Treasury.  The Department of Environmental Quality shall review the lists of recommended water infrastructure projects and issue its list of recommended projects to the Mississippi Department of Health for its advice.  Grant agreements shall be executed between the recipient and the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality.  All final awards shall be determined at the discretion of the executive director of the department.  Any funds awarded to the City of Jackson under this section shall be deposited in the Capital City Water/Sewer Projects Fund of the State Treasury.  Funds shall be obligated to a grantee upon the execution of a grant agreement between the department and the approved applicant.  Funds shall be made available to a grantee when the department obtains the necessary support for reimbursement.  The department is authorized to conduct additional rounds of grants as needed; however, in the first round no more than forty percent (40%) of the total funds appropriated for each grant program may be awarded by the department, and the remaining funds may be awarded in the final round which shall occur no later than six (6) months from the previous round.  To ensure equitable treatment between the categories of projects, no less than twenty percent (20%) awarded under this section shall be allocated to each of the three (3) categories of drinking water projects, wastewater projects and stormwater projects.  In the final round, any funds not requested may be allocated to any category. (11)  Grant funds shall be used prospectively; however, grant funds may be used to reimburse expenses incurred before the enactment of this program if the costs are adequately documented and comply with applicable ARPA guidelines.  An applicant must agree to obtain all necessary state and federal permits and follow all state bidding and contracting laws and fiscally sound practices in the administration of the funds. (12)  (a)  Monies must be disbursed under this section in compliance with the guidelines, guidance, rules, regulations or other criteria, as may be amended from time to time, of the United States Department of the Treasury regarding the use of monies from the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund, established by the American Rescue Plan of 2021. (b)  The use of funds allocated under this program shall be subject to audit by the United States Department of the Treasury's Office of Inspector General and the Mississippi Office of the State Auditor.  Each person receiving funds under these programs found to be fully or partially noncompliant with the requirements in this section shall return to the state all or a portion of the funds received. (13)  The department shall submit to the Lieutenant Governor, Speaker of the House, House and Senate Appropriations Chairmen, and the Legislative Budget Office quarterly reports and annual reports that are due by the dates established in the Compliance and Reporting Guidance by the United States Department of Treasury.  The reports shall contain the applications received, the score of the applications, the amount of grant funds awarded to each applicant, the amount of grant funds expended by each applicant, and status of each applicant's project.  The score of the applications is not required if the award was provided in the final round of grants and the Legislature provided the total amount of funds for all eligible grant requests. (14)  Grant funds shall be available under this section through * * * December 31 September 30, 2026 * * *, or on the date of the fund expenditure deadline provided by the federal government, whichever occurs later.  Each grant recipient shall certify for any project for which a grant is awarded that if the project is not completed by * * * December 31 September 30, 2026, and the United States Congress does not enact an extension of the deadline on the availability of ARPA funds, then the grant recipient will complete the project through other funds. (15)  The Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality may retain an amount not to exceed five percent (5%) of the total funds allocated to the program to defray administrative costs. (16)  The department shall be exempt from provisions of the Public Procurement Review Board for any requirements of personal or professional service contracts or the pre-approval of the solicitation for such contracts used in the execution of its responsibilities under this section.  This subsection shall stand repealed on January 1, * * * 2026 2027. (17)  The provisions of this section shall stand repealed on January 1, 2027. SECTION 16.  Section 57-123-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 57-123-7.  (1)  As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Destination marketing organization" means: (i)  Special local governmental units created by local and private laws of the State of Mississippi for the purpose of tourism promotion, funded by special local tax levies, and staffed with professionals engaged in out-of-state tourism marketing and tourism product development for municipalities, counties and/or regions; or (ii)  Publicly funded local organizations that engage in out-of-state tourism marketing and tourism development for municipalities, counties and/or regions. (b)  "Marketing activities" means multimedia marketing and advertising, including digital media, broadcast media and printed media, including travel publications, production, travel market sector analysis, consumer travel sentiment, public relations, communication strategy, direct sales bookings, group tour bookings, tourism development and administrative costs to execute marketing activities related to the business disruption effects of the Coronavirus Disease 2019 as expressed in Section 1 of Chapter 399, Laws of 2022. (2)  (a)  The Department of Finance and Administration shall establish a program for the purpose of providing funds to assist destination marketing organizations in paying costs for marketing activities as provided in this section.  Monies disbursed by the Department of Finance and Administration under this section shall be disbursed in compliance with all requirements and/or conditions on funds appropriated from the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund for the program established under this section.  The Department of Finance and Administration shall determine, in conjunction with the destination marketing organizations, the allocation of funds under this section and shall disburse funds as follows: (i)  Not more than Nine Million Four Hundred Twenty-seven Thousand Five Hundred Fifty-seven Dollars ($9,427,557.00) of such monies shall be allocated to destination marketing organizations in a manner that will provide monies to a destination marketing organization in an amount equal to seventy-five percent (75%) of the destination marketing organization's marketing and advertising expenditures during the 2019 fiscal year, and (ii)  Not more than Twenty Million Five Hundred Seventy-two Thousand Four Hundred Forty-three Dollars ($20,572,443.00) of such monies shall be allocated to destination marketing organizations based on the proportion that a destination marketing organization's contribution toward total tourism visitors in the state according to the 2019 Fiscal Year Visit Mississippi Visitors Profile Report bears to all destination marketing organizations' contributions toward total tourism visitors in the state according to the 2019 Fiscal Year Visit Mississippi Visitors Profile Report.  However, a destination marketing organization shall not receive an amount less than Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) under this subparagraph (ii). (b)  Within fifteen (15) days after July 1, 2022, the Department of Finance and Administration shall distribute the funds allocated under paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) to eligible destination marketing organizations.  Before receiving funds under this subsection (2), a destination marketing organization must certify to the Department of Finance and Administration that: (i)  The funds will only be used for marketing activities, and (ii)  The destination marketing organization will comply with applicable federal and state regulations and requirements related to American Rescue Plan Act funds, and (iii)  The destination marketing organization will obligate all funds by December 31, 2024, and fully expend all funds by * * * December 31 September 30, 2026. (c)  Destination marketing organizations receiving funds under this subsection (2) shall keep and maintain records related to expenditures.  Destination marketing organizations receiving funds under this subsection (2) shall also track impacts of their marketing activities through special levy tax receipts, hotel occupancy indicators, other tourism industry metrics, and analytics from marketing campaigns, as appropriate.  Such destination marketing organizations shall provide semi-annual reports on expenditures and economic impacts of their marketing activities to the Department of Finance and Administration, the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the Department of Audit. (d)  Subject to applicable purchasing laws, destination marketing organizations will give preference, when available and practical, to Mississippi-based companies for any new contracts entered into for marketing activities. (3)  The Department of Finance and Administration and the Department of Audit shall have all powers necessary for the implementation of this section. SECTION 17.  Section 57-123-53, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 57-123-53.  (1)  As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Destination marketing organization" means an organization that received funds under Section 57-123-7, Mississippi Code of 1972. (b)  "Marketing activities" means multimedia marketing and advertising, including digital media, broadcast media and printed media, including travel publications, production, travel market sector analysis, consumer travel sentiment, public relations, communication strategy, direct sales bookings, group tour bookings, tourism development and administrative costs to execute marketing activities related to the business disruption effects of the Coronavirus Disease 2019 as expressed in Section 57-123-51. (2)  (a)  The Department of Finance and Administration shall establish a program for the purpose of providing funds to assist destination marketing organizations in paying costs for marketing activities as provided in this section and to assist certain museums as provided in this section.  Monies disbursed by the Department of Finance and Administration under this section shall be disbursed in compliance with all requirements and/or conditions on funds appropriated from the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund for the program established under this section.  Monies in the fund shall be disbursed by the Department of Finance and Administration as follows: (i)  Twenty-one Million Dollars ($21,000,000.00) shall be disbursed as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2) to assist destination marketing organizations in paying costs for marketing activities; and (ii)  One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) shall be disbursed to the GRAMMY® Museum Mississippi, in Cleveland, Mississippi, to assist in paying costs associated with advertising and other forms of promoting and publicizing the museum and museum related activities, and repairs and renovations of and upgrades and improvements to the museum for health and safety purposes related to the Coronavirus Disease 19. (b)  (i)  The Department of Finance and Administration shall determine, in conjunction with the destination marketing organizations, the allocation of funds under paragraph (a)(i) of this subsection (2) and shall disburse funds as follows: 1.  Not more than Nine Million Four Hundred Twenty-seven Thousand Five Hundred Fifty-seven Dollars ($9,427,557.00) of such monies shall be allocated to destination marketing organizations in a manner that will provide monies to a destination marketing organization in an amount equal to seventy-five percent (75%) of the destination marketing organization's marketing and advertising expenditures during the 2019 fiscal year, and 2.  Not more than Eleven Million Five Hundred Seventy-two Thousand Four Hundred Forty-three Dollars ($11,572,443.00) of such monies shall be allocated to destination marketing organizations based on the proportion that a destination marketing organization's contribution toward total tourism visitors in the state according to the 2019 Fiscal Year Visit Mississippi Visitors Profile Report bears to all destination marketing organizations' contributions toward total tourism visitors in the state according to the 2019 Fiscal Year Visit Mississippi Visitors Profile Report.  However, a destination marketing organization shall not receive an amount less than One Hundred Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($125,000.00) under this item 2. (ii)  Destination marketing organizations receiving funds under this paragraph (b) shall provide details related to their planned expenditures to the Department of Finance and Administration prior to funds being disbursed.  If the plans submitted by the destination marketing organizations include activities described in this section as eligible under this program, the department shall approve the plan within thirty (30) days of receipt of the plans. (iii)  Before receiving funds under this paragraph (b), a destination marketing organization must certify to the Department of Finance and Administration that: 1.  The funds will only be used for marketing activities, and 2.  The destination marketing organization will comply with applicable federal and state regulations and requirements related to American Rescue Plan Act funds, and 3.  The destination marketing organization will obligate all funds by December 31, 2024, and fully expend all funds by * * * December 31 September 30, 2026. (iv)  Destination marketing organizations receiving funds under this paragraph (b) shall keep and maintain records related to expenditures.  Destination marketing organizations receiving funds under this paragraph (b) shall also track impacts of their marketing activities through special levy tax receipts, hotel occupancy indicators, other tourism industry metrics, and analytics from marketing campaigns, as appropriate.  Such destination marketing organizations shall provide semi-annual reports on expenditures and economic impacts of their marketing activities to the Department of Finance and Administration, the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the Department of Audit. (v)  Subject to applicable purchasing laws, destination marketing organizations will give preference, when available and practical, to Mississippi-based companies for any new contracts entered into for marketing activities. (3)  The Department of Finance and Administration and the Department of Audit shall have all powers necessary for the implementation of this section. SECTION 18.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.